Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.dic
acheter/b4p+() po:v1itp
achever/b4p+() po:v1tp
amener/b4p+() po:v1tp
égrener/b4p+() po:v1tp
élever/b4p+() po:v1tp
engrener/b4p+() po:v1tp
enlever/b4p+() po:v1tp
